Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB979.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8817(a) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8817. Changes in assessed valuation.(a) General rule.--[In] Subject to subsection (a.1), in addition to other authorization provided in this chapter, the assessors may change the assessed valuation on real property when a parcel of land is subdivided into smaller parcels or when improvements exceeding 20% of the most recent assessed value of real property are made to real property or existing improvements are removed from real property or are destroyed. The recording of a subdivision plan shall not constitute grounds for assessment increases until lots are sold or improvements 123456789101112131415161718 exceeding 20% of the most recent assessed value of real property are installed. The painting of a building or the normal regular repairs to a building shall not be deemed cause for a change in valuation by the assessors under the authority of this section.(a.1) Limitation.--Assessors may not assess real property when improvements are made to real property if:(1) the improvements are equal to or less than 20% of the most recent assessed value of the real property;(2) the real property is the primary residence of the owner of the real property for a period of at least five years from the date improvements were installed; and(3) this is the only time during the real property owner's ownership of the real property when improvements equal to or less than 20% of the most recent assessed value of the real property are made.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0979PN1141 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617